Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.116.030

Award of scholarships.

(1) The office may award scholarships to eligible students from the foster care scholarship endowment fund in RCW 28B.116.060, from funds appropriated to the student achievement council for this purpose, from any private donations, or from any other funds given to the office for the program.

(2) The office may award scholarships to eligible students from moneys earned from the foster care scholarship endowment fund created in RCW 28B.116.060, or from funds appropriated to the council for this purpose, or from any private donations, or from any other funds given to the office for this program. For an undergraduate student, the amount of the scholarship shall not exceed the student's demonstrated financial need. For a graduate student, the amount of the scholarship shall not exceed the student's demonstrated need; or the stipend of a teaching assistant, including tuition, at the University of Washington; whichever is higher. In calculating a student's need, the office shall consider the student's costs for tuition, fees, books, supplies, transportation, room, board, personal expenses, and child care. The student's scholarship awarded under this chapter shall not exceed the amount received by a student attending a state research university. A student is eligible to receive a scholarship for a maximum of five years. However, the length of the scholarship shall be determined at the discretion of the office.

(3) Grants under this chapter shall not affect eligibility for the state student financial aid program.

[ 2012 c 229 s 569; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 216; 2005 c 215 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.